Tennessee statutes. Title 9 Public Finances
Part 11

Health Care Revenue Anticipation Notes

9-21-1101. Authorization, security, and retirement of health care revenue anticipation notes.

The governing body of a local government operating a nursing home is authorized to issue health care revenue anticipation notes under this part and part 1 of this chapter for the purpose of providing funds to be transferred to the state pursuant to an approved intergovernmental transfer agreement between the state and the local government. The principal amount of the notes shall not exceed an amount as determined by the commissioner of finance and administration, as specified in the intergovernmental transfer agreement. The sale of the notes shall first be approved by the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee. Such notes and any interest thereon shall be secured solely by the payments by the state to the local government pursuant to the intergovernmental transfer agreement, and any payments received from the state by the local government shall immediately be applied to the retirement of any health care revenue anticipation notes issued for such purpose, together with any interest accruing thereon, with any remainder being used in such manner as determined by the governing body of the local government.

Acts 2004, ch. 705, § 2; 2010, ch. 868, § 72.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 11, §§9-21-1101 —9-21-1104, (Acts 2000, ch. 983, § 8), concerning health care revenue anticipation notes, expired on June 30, 2003, pursuant to Acts 2000, ch. 983, § 8.

9-21-1102. Terms of health care revenue anticipation notes.

Health care revenue anticipation notes shall be sold at not less than par value plus accrued interest. Health care revenue anticipation notes may be sold in one (1) or more series, may bear such date or dates, may bear interest at such rate or rates, which may vary from time to time, may be payable at such time or times, may be in such denomination or denominations, may be in such form, either coupon or registered, may be payable at such place or places, may be executed in such manner, may be payable in such medium of payment, may be subject to such terms of redemption, without a premium, all as may be provided by resolution of the governing body of the local government. The notes shall mature no later than thirty (30) days from the date of issuance.

Acts 2004, ch. 705, § 2.

9-21-1103. Method of sale of health care revenue anticipation notes.

Health care revenue anticipation notes may be sold in such manner either at a competitive public sale or at a private negotiated sale as the governing body of the local government may direct.

Acts 2004, ch. 705, § 2.

9-21-1104. Interfund loans.

Local governments are hereby authorized to make interfund loans in accordance with procedures for issuance of notes under this part.

Acts 2004, ch. 705, § 2.